Hawaii statutes.
[§206E-19] Annual report. The
authority shall submit to the governor and the legislature, at least twenty
days prior to the start of any regular session, a complete and detailed report
of its activities. [L 1976, c 153, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next